Massachusetts, session 194th, S1561.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 25N the following new section:-
25N1/4. There shall be established an obstetrics/gynecology workforce development loan
repayment grant program, for the purpose of enhancing recruitment and retention of
obstetrics/gynecology physicians and other clinicians. The grant program shall be administered
by the health care workforce center established by section 25L. The program shall provide
repayment assistance for graduate and medical school loans to participants who: (1) are
graduates of medical, nursing, or physician assistant schools or accredited graduate schools; (2)
specialize in obstetrics/gynecology; (3) serve in a medically underserved area as determined by
the center; and (4) preference may be given to applicants who represent diverse populations or
who speak multiple languages that help them serve patients in the community they practice.
of 1